Utah statutes.
32B-6-409.   Conversion from dining club license to different type of retail license.

(1)  In accordance with this section, a dining club licensee may convert its dining club license to a different type of retail license, including a different type of club license during the time period:

(a)  beginning on July 1, 2011; and

(b)  ending on June 30, 2013.

(2)  A dining club licensee may convert its dining license only to a retail license for which the dining club licensee qualifies.

(3)  The commission shall provide a procedure for a dining club to convert to a different type of retail license as provided in this section by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

(4)  After a dining club license is converted to another type of retail license, the retail licensee shall operate under the provisions relevant to the type of retail license held by the retail licensee, except that, in accordance with Section 32B-1-201, the retail license is not considered in determining the total number of licenses available for that type of retail license.

(5)  If a dining club license is converted to full-service restaurant license, limited-service restaurant license, or beer-only restaurant license, the bar structure of the dining club is considered:

(a)  a seating grandfathered bar structure for purposes of a full-service restaurant license or a limited-service restaurant license; or

(b)  a grandfathered bar structure for purposes of a beer-only restaurant license.

